Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-915
Sewers; resolution to construct; posting.

If there is no newspaper of general circulation published within any such city or village, notice as provided in section 17-914 shall be given for the same length of time by posting the same in three conspicuous places in such city or village, two of which shall be the clerk's office and the post office.

Laws 1919, c. 189, § 3, p. 428;

C.S.1922, § 4339;

C.S.1929, § 17-530;

R.S.1943, § 17-915.